Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Article 3. Right of Entry After Filing Petition.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 33, 97.

§ 25.1-223.
Right to enter upon property.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any petitioner may enter upon the property to be condemned at any time after the filing of its petition for condemnation, for the purpose of constructing its works or improvements thereon in the manner proposed by the petitioner upon approval of the petitioner’s application for entry as provided in this article.

Notice of the petitioner’s application for entry shall be served on the owners in the same manner as is provided in this chapter for service of notice of the filing of a petition.

History.

Code 1919, § 4362; 1924, p. 60; Code 1950, §§ 25-3, 25-4; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.8; 1977, c. 394; 1979, c. 494; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to pendency of escheat proceedings no bar to condemnation proceedings, see §

55.1-2441

.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.03 Eminent Domain Condemnations. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-402 Certificate of Take; No. 6-408 Notice of Application for Right of Entry; No. 6-409 Order Granting Right of Entry; No. 6-411 Notice by Publication.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Right of immediate entry. —

Evidence was sufficient to show the existence of an immediate necessity and pressing need to satisfy the “emergency” requirement, justifying a natural gas company’s early entry onto properties, because there were a number of interruptions to some of the company’s larger customers; until the company completed the project, those same customers were at risk of both potential loss of service or potential price fluctuations. Va. Natural Gas, Inc. v. Sumner, 98 Va. Cir. 167, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 21 (Chesapeake Feb. 23, 2018).

Bona fide offer to purchase property. —

Natural gas company made a bona fide effort to purchase properties because the company offered what it considered to be fair market values; the offers were rejected by the property owners, which resulted in the company filing a petition condemnation and application for entry. Va. Natural Gas, Inc. v. Sumner, 98 Va. Cir. 167, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 21 (Chesapeake Feb. 23, 2018).

§ 25.1-224.
Conditions upon entry; bonding; withdrawal of share by owner.

The court, after 21 days following service of the petitioner’s application, and after a hearing thereon, may approve the petitioner’s application if it finds that:

A public necessity or an essential public convenience requires such entry for such purposes;

An emergency exists justifying such entry before the time when just compensation can be determined and the amount so determined paid into court; and

The interests of the owners of such property will be adequately protected by (i) the payment into court for the benefit of the owners of the amount of the offer made in accordance with §

25.1-204

or (ii) if no offer is required by that section, by the payment into the court of the amount of a good faith estimate of the value of the property.

In addition, the court may require the petitioner to give a surety bond in an amount and with such surety as the court may determine.

Upon such findings and payment and the giving of such bond, if any is required, with surety in the office of the clerk or with the court, conditioned as required by law and to the effect that the petitioner and its surety or sureties are bound to the owners of the property to be taken or damaged to secure to each of them payment of just compensation therefor as finally determined in the condemnation proceedings, the petitioner shall have the right to enter and construct its works or improvements upon or through the property as described in its petition.

At any time after such payment into court, a party whose property or interest therein is to be taken or damaged may apply to the court for the withdrawal of his share thereof in the manner provided in §

25.1-243

.

The clerk shall deposit the funds so paid to the credit of the court in an account of a type that bears interest.

At any time during the condemnation proceedings, if it appears necessary to do so in order to protect the owners of the property or estate or interest therein to be condemned and assure unto them the payment of just compensation to which they are entitled, the court may require the petitioner to give a new and additional bond in an amount and with sureties satisfactory to the court.

History.

Code 1919, § 4362; 1924, p. 60; Code 1950, §§ 25-3, 25-4; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.8; 1977, c. 394; 1979, c. 494; 2003, c. 940.

§ 25.1-225.
Abandonment of proceedings after entry upon property.

If the petitioner enters upon the property under this section and does any work thereon, or causes any injury or damage to such property, it shall not thereafter be entitled, without the consent of the owner, to abandon the proceedings for the condemnation thereof, but shall conduct the condemnation proceedings with reasonable dispatch to final judgment.

History.

Code 1919, § 4362; 1924, p. 60; Code 1950, §§ 25-3, 25-4; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.8; 1977, c. 394; 1979, c. 494; 2003, c. 940.